Utah statutes.
17-22-3.   Transfer of prisoners to state prison.

The sheriff of the county in which a criminal is sentenced to confinement in the state prison, or is sentenced to death, shall cause such convict to be removed from the county jail within five days after the sentence and conveyed to the state prison and delivered to the warden thereof.



No Change Since 1953

